Oklahoma, session 2026, SB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 405.6 of Title 10, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensed child care facility shall ensure that no print or


nonprint materials or multimedia resources located on the premises


of the facility contain any content related to sexual orientation or


gender identity.


B. A child care facility found by the Department of Human


Services to be in violation of subsection A of this section after


complaint and investigation shall be subject to corrective and


administrative action as provided by Sections 406 and 407 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 1544 Page 1


C. The Director of Human Services may promulgate rules as


necessary to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1544 DC 12/30/2024 4:03:24 PM







































Req. No. 1544 Page 2